Maine, session 132, LD94.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1596, as amended by PL 2023, c. 416, §1, is further amended
by amending the section headnote to read:
§1596. Abortion and miscarriage data
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §1596, sub-§1, ¶B, as repealed and replaced by PL 1989, c. 274,
§1, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §1596, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2019, c. 262, §1, is repealed.
Page 1 - 132LR0620(02)